Maryland, session 2025, SB0282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
1–101.1.
“ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–101.2.

SENATE BILL 282 3
“ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–103.1.
“ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.1.
“RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.2.
“SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–116.
“UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–117.
(A) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) With respect to any State program of benefits, rights, or privileges applicable
to a veteran under this Code, “veteran” includes[, if the individual is eligible under 38
U.S.C. § 101, a member of the commissioned corps of:
(1) the Public Health Service; or
(2) the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration or its
predecessor, the Coast and Geodetic Survey] AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
DEFINITION OF “VETERAN” UNDER § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Natural Resources
1–106.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 282
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(C) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(D) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(b)] (E) “Informational meeting” means a meeting, open to the public, at which
the applicant or the Department of Natural Resources presents information concerning a
permit or certificate application. An informational meeting is not a contested case hearing
nor an agency hearing under § 10–202(d) of the State Government Article.
[(c)] (F) “Public hearing” means a meeting, open to the public, at which the
Department of Natural Resources receives oral and written comments concerning a
decision to issue or deny a permit or certificate. A public hearing is not a contested case
hearing nor an agency hearing under § 10–202(d) of the State Government Article.
(G) “SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(H) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(I) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–405.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible sponsor organization” means a nonprofit charitable
organization that provides any of the following opportunities for Gold Star recipients,
disabled veterans or other veterans who could benefit from one of the opportunities
provided, disabled SERVICE members [of the armed forces of the United States] or other
SERVICE members [of the armed forces of the United States] who could benefit from one
of the opportunities provided, or permanently disabled persons who require the use of a
wheelchair:
(i) Recreational hunting or fishing, including providing at no cost:
1. An angler’s license and trout stamps;
2. A Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license; or

SENATE BILL 282 5
3. A hunting license and any corresponding stamps;
(ii) Recreational water activities;
(iii) Other recreational outdoor activities;
(iv) Therapeutic outdoor activities; or
(v) Workforce training for green jobs, including outdoor agricultural
jobs.
(3) “Gold Star recipient” means a recipient of the U.S. Department of
Defense Gold Star for surviving spouses, parents, and next of kin of members of the armed
forces [of the United States] who lost their lives in combat.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Chesapeake
Bay Trust may use the Healing Hunting and Fishing Fund established under subsection
(d) of this section to make grants to eligible sponsor organizations.
(ii) In awarding a grant to an eligible sponsor organization that
provides opportunities that the eligible sponsor organization believes benefit veterans or
SERVICE members [of the armed forces of the United States], the Chesapeake Bay Trust
shall determine whether the opportunities provided by the eligible sponsor organization
will, in fact, benefit veterans or SERVICE members [of the armed forces of the United
States].
(2) A grant awarded under this subsection may be used only to pay capital,
operational, or programming costs incurred by an eligible sponsor organization in providing
any of the following opportunities:
(i) Recreational hunting or fishing, including providing at no cost:
1. An angler’s license and trout stamps;
2. A Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license; or
3. A hunting license and any corresponding stamps;
(ii) Recreational water activities;
(iii) Other recreational outdoor activities;
(iv) Therapeutic outdoor activities; or

SENATE BILL 282
(v) Workforce training for green jobs, including outdoor agricultural
jobs.
(c) The Department shall adopt regulations to implement this section, including
regulations establishing eligibility requirements for applicants for grants to eligible
sponsor organizations.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “Fund” means the Healing Hunting and Fishing
Fund.
(2) There is a Healing Hunting and Fishing Fund.
(3) The purpose of the Fund is to provide any of the following opportunities
for Gold Star recipients, disabled veterans or other veterans who could benefit from one of
the opportunities, disabled SERVICE members [of the armed forces of the United States]
or other SERVICE members [of the armed forces of the United States] who could benefit
from one of the opportunities, and permanently disabled persons who require the use of a
wheelchair:
(i) Recreational hunting or fishing, including providing at no cost:
1. An angler’s license and trout stamps;
2. A Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license; or
3. A hunting license and any corresponding stamps;
(ii) Recreational water activities;
(iii) Other recreational outdoor activities;
(iv) Therapeutic outdoor activities; or
(v) Workforce training for green jobs, including outdoor agricultural
jobs.
(10) Money expended from the Fund for grants to eligible sponsor
organizations is supplemental to and is not intended to take the place of funding that
otherwise would be appropriated for any of the opportunities specified under subsection
(b)(2) of this section that are provided to Gold Star recipients, disabled veterans or other
veterans who could benefit from one of the opportunities, disabled SERVICE members [of
the armed forces of the United States] or other SERVICE members [of the armed forces of
the United States] who could benefit from one of the opportunities, or permanently disabled
persons who require the use of a wheelchair.
4–217.

SENATE BILL 282 7
(b) (1) The Department may issue an annual license exemption to a
governmental entity or a nonprofit organization to:
(i) Take individuals with physical or mental disabilities who are
[serving or have served in the armed forces of the United States] VETERANS OR ACTIVE
SERVICE MEMBERS fishing in the tidal or nontidal waters of the State; or
(ii) Provide fishing clinics and instructional opportunities to:
1. Individuals who are [serving or have served in the armed
forces of the United States] VETERANS OR ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBERS;
2. Individuals who are participating in a physical or mental
wellness outdoor event;
3. Individuals who are participating in a special needs
outdoor event;
4. Individuals who are acting under the authority of a
scientific collection permit issued under § 4–212 of this subtitle; or
5. Residents of the State who are underserved with respect
to fishing opportunities, as determined by the Department in regulation.
4–604.
(c) An angler’s license is not required of the following:
(2) Any resident [serving in the armed forces of the United States] WHO IS
AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER, while on leave in the State, during the resident’s leave
period, if, while angling, the resident possesses a copy of the resident’s official leave order;
4–607.
(a) (1) The Department may issue annually a complimentary angler’s license to
the President of the United States, the governor of any state, and any official of the game
and fish department of any other state.
(2) The Department may issue a lifetime complimentary angler’s license to
any Maryland resident who certifies that the resident is:
(i) A former prisoner of war;
(ii) An American veteran who the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs determines is unemployable; or

SENATE BILL 282
(iii) A 100% service connected disabled American veteran.
(3) The Department may issue a lifetime complimentary angler’s license to
an out–of–state person:
(i) Who certifies that the person is:
1. A former prisoner of war;
2. An American veteran who the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs determines is unemployable; or
3. A 100% service connected disabled American veteran; and
(ii) Whose state of residence extends similar privileges to former
prisoners of war, American veterans who the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs
determines are unemployable, or 100% service connected disabled American veterans of this
State.
(b) Not more than 20 complimentary angler’s licenses for each state other than
Maryland shall be outstanding at any time.
(c) A complimentary angler’s license is not transferable and shall be issued
without a fee.
(d) For the purposes of this section, “former prisoner of war” means a person who,
while [serving in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States] AN ACTIVE
SERVICE MEMBER, was forcibly detained or interned in the line of duty by an enemy
government or its agents, or a hostile force, during a period of armed conflict.
4–705.
(A) A license does not lapse if the licensee fails to renew or make bona fide use of
[his] THE license because of [induction or enlistment into] THE LICENSEE’S
DEPLOYMENT IN the [armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES or employment in essential
war industries[, and the].
(B) THE licensee [applies] SHALL INFORM THE DEPARTMENT BEFORE THE
LICENSEE’S DEPLOYMENT AND APPLY to the Department for the renewal of [his] THE
license within [one] 1 year of the termination of hostilities or from the date of [his] THE
LICENSEE’S release from DEPLOYMENT IN the [armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES.
(C) If a licensee cannot fish every net for which [he] THE LICENSEE was licensed
at any time during a war emergency because of some condition arising out of a war, [he]
THE LICENSEE may not be deprived of [his] THE right to a license for these nets thereafter.

SENATE BILL 282 9
4–745.
(c) A person may fish for finfish in the Chesapeake Bay or its tidal tributaries or
in State waters of the Atlantic Ocean and coastal bays and their tributaries without a
Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license if the person:
(5) Is a resident [serving in the armed forces of the United States] WHO IS
AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER while on leave in the State, during the resident’s leave
period, if, while fishing, the resident possesses a copy of the resident’s official leave order;
(e) (1) In this subsection, “former prisoner of war” means a person who, while
[serving in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States] AN ACTIVE
SERVICE MEMBER, was forcibly detained or interned in the line of duty by an enemy
government or its agents, or a hostile force, during a period of armed conflict.
(2) The Department may issue a lifetime complimentary Chesapeake Bay
and coastal sport fishing license to any Maryland resident who certifies that the resident
is:
(i) A former prisoner of war;
(ii) An American veteran who the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs determines is unemployable; or
(iii) A 100% service connected disabled American veteran.
(3) The Department may issue a lifetime complimentary Chesapeake Bay
and coastal sport fishing license to an out–of–state person:
(i) Who certifies that the person is:
1. A former prisoner of war;
2. An American veteran who the U.S. Department of
Veterans Affairs determines is unemployable; or
3. A 100% service connected disabled American veteran; and
(ii) Whose state of residence extends similar privileges to former
prisoners of war, American veterans who the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs
determines are unemployable, or 100% service connected disabled American veterans of
this State.
5–1014.

SENATE BILL 282
(A) ON PRESENTATION OF A VALID UNIFORMED SERVICES IDENTIFICATION
CARD BY AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR ANY MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND
NATIONAL GUARD:
(1) AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR ANY MEMBER OF THE
MARYLAND NATIONAL GUARD MAY ENTER A STATE PARK WITHOUT PAYING ANY
DAY–USE ENTRY FEE THAT HAS BEEN ESTABLISHED; AND
(2) A VEHICLE OF WHICH AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR ANY
MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND NATIONAL GUARD IS AN OCCUPANT MAY ENTER A
STATE PARK WITHOUT PAYING ANY PER–VEHICLE FEE THAT HAS BEEN
ESTABLISHED.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT EXEMPT AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER, ANY
MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND NATIONAL GUARD, OR ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL FROM
PAYING OTHER FACILITY USE SERVICES FEES NOT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION.
5–1015.
(A) ON PRESENTATION OF A VALID VETERAN IDENTIFICATION CARD, A
DRIVER’S LICENSE THAT INDICATES THE LICENSE HOLDER IS A VETERAN, OR ANY
OTHER FORM OF IDENTIFICATION ACCEPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT
ESTABLISHES THE HOLDER’S VETERAN STATUS:
(1) A VETERAN MAY ENTER A STATE PARK WITHOUT PAYING ANY
DAY–USE ENTRY FEE THAT HAS BEEN ESTABLISHED; AND
(2) A VEHICLE OF WHICH A VETERAN IS AN OCCUPANT MAY ENTER A
STATE PARK WITHOUT PAYING ANY PER–VEHICLE FEE THAT HAS BEEN
ESTABLISHED.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT EXEMPT A VETERAN OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL
FROM PAYING ANY OTHER FACILITY USE SERVICES FEES NOT DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
10–301.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the following
persons are not required to obtain a hunter’s license, bow and arrow stamp, black powder
stamp, bonus antlered deer stamp, or sika deer stamp:
(ii) Any resident [serving in the armed forces of the United States]
WHO IS AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER while on leave in the State, during the resident’s

SENATE BILL 282 11
leave period, if, while hunting, the resident possesses a copy of the resident’s official leave
order;
(iii) Any person [serving in the armed forces of the United States] who
IS AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER AND has a service–connected disability, if, while hunting,
the person possesses valid military identification; and
10–303.
(a) (1) The Department annually may issue a complimentary hunting license
to the President of the United States, the governor of any state, or an official or an
enforcement officer of the game and fish management agency of another state which
reciprocally offers complimentary hunting licenses.
(2) (i) Subject to the requirements of § 10–301.1 of this subtitle, the
Department may issue a lifetime complimentary hunting license to a Maryland resident who
certifies that the resident is:
1. A former prisoner of war;
2. An American veteran who the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs determines is unemployable; or
3. A 100% service connected disabled American veteran.
(ii) Subject to the requirements of § 10–301.1 of this subtitle, the
Department may issue a lifetime complimentary hunting license to an out–of–state person:
1. Who certifies that the person is:
A. A former prisoner of war;
B. An American veteran who the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs determines is unemployable; or
C. A 100% service connected disabled American veteran; and
2. Whose state of residence extends similar privileges to
former prisoners of war, American veterans who the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs
determines are unemployable, or 100% service connected disabled American veterans of this
State.
(3) A complimentary license is not transferable.
(b) For the purposes of this section, “former prisoner of war” means a person who,
while [serving in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States] AN ACTIVE

SENATE BILL 282
SERVICE MEMBER, was forcibly detained or interned in the line of duty by an enemy
government or its agents, or a hostile force, during a period of armed conflict.
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
(C) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) SERVING IN A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES ON ACTIVE DUTY ORDERS.
(D) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 10 U.S.C. § 101.
[(b)] (E) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
[(c)] (F) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military
Families.
(G) “MILITARY FAMILY” INCLUDES THE SPOUSE AND DEPENDENT
CHILDREN OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION.
(H) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(d)] (I) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
(J) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
[(e)] (K) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(L) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(f)] (M) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, “veteran” [means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than

SENATE BILL 282 13
for training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.